Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-311
Sale, lease, or transfer; law applicable.

All provisions of law pertaining to any sale, lease or transfer of any electric light and power plant, distribution system or transmission lines by cities, villages, and public electric light and power districts to any private person, firm, association or corporation, shall be applicable, as nearly as may be, to irrigation districts which shall acquire, establish or own any such plant, lines or system.

Laws 1931, c. 91, § 11, p. 258;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 46-711;

R.S.1943, § 46-311.